Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.340

Variance between proposed and final rule.

(1) Unless it complies with subsection (3) of this section, an agency may not adopt a rule that is substantially different from the rule proposed in the published notice of proposed rule adoption or a supplemental notice in the proceeding. If an agency contemplates making a substantial variance from a proposed rule described in a published notice, it may file a supplemental notice with the code reviser meeting the requirements of RCW 34.05.320 and reopen the proceedings for public comment on the proposed variance, or the agency may withdraw the proposed rule and commence a new rule-making proceeding to adopt a substantially different rule. If a new rule-making proceeding is commenced, relevant public comment received regarding the initial proposed rule shall be considered in the new proceeding.

(2) The following factors shall be considered in determining whether an adopted rule is substantially different from the proposed rule on which it is based:

(a) The extent to which a reasonable person affected by the adopted rule would have understood that the published proposed rule would affect his or her interests;

(b) The extent to which the subject of the adopted rule or the issues determined in it are substantially different from the subject or issues involved in the published proposed rule; and

(c) The extent to which the effects of the adopted rule differ from the effects of the published proposed rule.

(3) If the agency, without filing a supplemental notice under subsection (1) of this section, adopts a rule that varies in content from the proposed rule, the general subject matter of the adopted rule must remain the same as the proposed rule. The agency shall briefly describe any changes, other than editing changes, and the principal reasons for adopting the changes. The brief description shall be filed with the code reviser together with the order of adoption for publication in the state register. Within sixty days of publication of the adopted rule in the state register, any interested person may petition the agency to amend any portion of the adopted rule that is substantially different from the proposed rule. The petition shall briefly demonstrate how the adopted rule is substantially different from the proposed rule and shall contain the text of the petitioner's proposed amendment. For purposes of the petition, an adopted rule is substantially different if the issues determined in the adopted rule differ from the issues determined in the proposed rule or the anticipated effects of the adopted rule differ from those of the proposed rule. If the petition meets the requirements of this subsection and RCW 34.05.330, the agency shall initiate rule-making proceedings upon the proposed amendments within the time provided in RCW 34.05.330.

[ 1989 c 175 s 9; 1988 c 288 s 307.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.